Hawaii statutes.
§186-2 Eligibility. (a) Any property
of not less than ten acres:

(1) Included within the agricultural district
pursuant to section 205-2; or

(2) Included within the conservation district and
zoned for commercial forest use;

is eligible for classification as tree farm property
if it is suited for the raising of commercial tree species and other forest
products in quantity sufficient to establish a business in the sale thereof.

(b) Property on which the owner is already
growing trees of commercial species and other forest products in quantity
sufficient to establish a business in the sale thereof under good forestry
management practices and which the owner agrees to manage in accordance with a
management plan approved by the board is eligible for classification as tree
farm property. Additional noncontiguous property of five acres or more, under
the same ownership and in the same vicinity, is also eligible for
classification along with the main acreage sought to be classified. No real
property under a lease having an unexpired term of less than twenty years is
eligible for classification as tree farm property. [L 1963, c 141, §3; Supp,
§87D-3; HRS §186-2; am L 1989, c 50, §1]

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next